New Jersey, session 221, A5464.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Notwithstanding any law, rule, or regulation to the contrary, after the effective date of P.L.    , c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill), the Board of Public Utilities shall not approve the request of any electric public utility to increase any component of an electric rate charged to ratepayers without conducting a full rate review for the electric public utility. For the purposes of this section, electric public utility means a public utility, as that term is defined in R.S.48:2-13, that transmits and distributes electricity to end users within the State. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.